California, session 20252026, AB1569.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 9 (commencing with Section 49397) is added to Chapter 8 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, to read: Article 9. Electric Bicycle Safety49397. (a) (1) On or before March 1, 2028, the department, in consultation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, shall develop a standardized electric bicycle safety and training program for pupils in grades 7 to 12, inclusive.(2) The program developed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include, but is not limited to, an online component consisting of instructional videos and a knowledge-based comprehensive assessment covering rules of the road, operating differences between the classes of electric bicycles, required safety equipment, and the civil and criminal implications of operating noncompliant electric bicycles that exceed legal speed limits.(3) The department and the Department of the California Highway Patrol may collaborate with local law enforcement agencies or local governments that have already implemented electric bicycle training programs to ensure the program developed pursuant to paragraph (1) reflects proven best practices.(b) A local educational agency or parent organization, in collaboration with local law enforcement agencies or local governments, is encouraged to offer training demonstrations to pupils and parents on electric bicycle operations related to safe mounting, braking, signaling, yielding, and riding protocols. These training demonstrations may be administered on school campuses or at a designated community facility.(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Classes of electric bicycles” include “class 1 electric bicycles,” “class 2 electric bicycles,” and “class 3 electric bicycles,” as defined in Section 312.5 of the Vehicle Code.(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.SECTION 1.Article 9 (commencing with Section 49397) is added to Chapter 8 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, to read:9.Electric Bicycle Safety49397.(a)Commencing with the 2027–28 school year, a local educational agency that allows pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, to park a class 1, 2, or 3 electric bicycle on campus shall require pupils to complete the electric bicycle safety and training program developed by the Department of the California Highway Patrol pursuant to Section 894 of the Streets and Highway Code, or a related safety course, if one is available, as prescribed by a local government or the local law enforcement authority having jurisdiction over the school, as a condition for parking on campus.(b)A pupil shall submit proof of completion from one of the prescribed courses described in subdivision (a) to their school before parking their class 1, 2, or 3 electric bicycle on the school campus.(c)A local educational agency that has adopted a policy related to electric bicycle safety on or before January 1, 2027, shall be exempt from the requirements of this section.(d)For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1)“Class 1 electric bicycle,” “class 2 electric bicycle,” and “class 3 electric bicycle” shall have the same meanings as prescribed in Section 312.5 of the Vehicle Code.(2)“Local educational agency” means a school district or county office of education.